Missouri, session 2026, SB1349.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 324, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 324.890, to read as
follows:
324.890. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Contractor", a person who is employed by a
corporation, firm, institution, organization, or company to
perform industrial mechanical maintenance work;
(2) "Establishment", any legally recognized business
entity engaged in manufacturing;
(3) "Industrial facility", any real property or
personal property or fixtures attached to real property at
which an establishment engages in a manufacturing activity
within an area that, if subject to a zoning ordinance or
regulation, is zoned for industrial or similar uses;
(4) "Industrial mechanical maintenance work",
maintenance of mechanical systems or equipment within an
industrial facility;
(5) "Local license", a license issued by a political
subdivision and valid only in that political subdivision

SB 1349 2
that is required to bid, accept, or perform mechanical work
in a political subdivision of this state;
(6) "Manufacturing", any activity described in
division D of the most recent version of the Standard
Industrial Classification Manual;
(7) "State license", a license issued by the state of
Missouri that is required to bid, accept, or perform
mechanical work in this state.
2. Any contractor performing industrial mechanical
maintenance work employed at an industrial facility shall
not be required to obtain a local license or state license
to perform industrial mechanical maintenance work for the
industrial facility.
✓